Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8.20 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Notification, as provided in this section, shall be required
when the Governor is absent from the state. Except in the event of
an emergency, at least twenty-four (24) hours prior to the Governor
being absent from the state, the Governor shall provide electronic
notification to the Lieutenant Governor of his or her plans to be
absent from the state, indicating the start date and time and the
anticipated return date and time in such notification. The
notification required by this section shall also be required of the
acting Governor, when he or she is absent from the state, and follow
the line of succession provided in Section 15 of Article VI of the
Oklahoma Constitution or as may be provided by law. In the event of
an emergency, notice shall be provided prior to being absent from
the state.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 11, 2027.

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4434 Page 2